test/src/gt-desc-yamls/A-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
      soe+A+Pl+Ela: soojadest
      soe+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: soojadenagi
      soe+A+Pl+Ess: soojadena
      soe+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: soojadegi
      soe+A+Pl+Gen: soojade
      soe+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: soojadessegi
      soe+A+Pl+Ill: soojadesse
      soe+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: soojadeski
      soe+A+Pl+Ine: soojades
      soe+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: soojadki
      soe+A+Pl+Nom: soojad
      soe+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: soojegi
      soe+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: soojasidki
      soe+A+Pl+Par: sooje
      soe+A+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare: soojasid
      soe+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: soojadekski
      soe+A+Pl+Tra: soojadeks
      soe+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: soojadenigi
      soe+A+Pl+Trm: soojadeni
      soe+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: soojatagi
      soe+A+Sg+Abe: soojata
      soe+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: soojaltki
      soe+A+Sg+Abl: soojalt
      soe+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: soojalgi
      soe+A+Sg+Ade: soojal
      soe+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: soojalegi
      soe+A+Sg+All: soojale
      soe+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: soojagagi
      soe+A+Sg+Com: soojaga
      soe+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: soojastki
      soe+A+Sg+Ela: soojast
      soe+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: soojanagi
      soe+A+Sg+Ess: soojana
      soe+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: soojagi
      soe+A+Sg+Gen: sooja
      soe+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: soojagi
      soe+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Hyp: soojassegi
      soe+A+Sg+Ill: sooja
      soe+A+Sg+Ill+Usage/Hyp: soojasse
      soe+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: soojaski
      soe+A+Sg+Ine: soojas
      soe+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: soegi
      soe+A+Sg+Nom: soe
      soe+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: soojagi
      soe+A+Sg+Par: sooja
      soe+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: soojakski
      soe+A+Sg+Tra: soojaks
      soe+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: soojanigi
      soe+A+Sg+Trm: soojani
      soolane+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: soolastetagi
      soolane+A+Pl+Abe: soolasteta
      soolane+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: soolasteltki
      soolane+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: soolaseiltki
      soolane+A+Pl+Abl: soolastelt
      soolane+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: soolaseilt
      soolane+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: soolastelgi
      soolane+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: soolaseilgi
      soolane+A+Pl+Ade: soolastel
      soolane+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: soolaseil
      soolane+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: soolastelegi
      soolane+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: soolaseilegi
      soolane+A+Pl+All: soolastele
      soolane+A+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: soolaseile
      soolane+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: soolastegagi
      soolane+A+Pl+Com: soolastega
      soolane+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: soolastestki
      soolane+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: soolaseistki
      soolane+A+Pl+Ela: soolastest
      soolane+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: soolaseist
      soolane+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: soolastenagi
      soolane+A+Pl+Ess: soolastena
      soolane+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: soolastegi
      soolane+A+Pl+Gen: soolaste
      soolane+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: soolastessegi
      soolane+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: soolaseissegi
      soolane+A+Pl+Ill: soolastesse
      soolane+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: soolaseisse
      soolane+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: soolasteski
      soolane+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: soolaseiski
      soolane+A+Pl+Ine: soolastes
      soolane+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: soolaseis
      soolane+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: soolasedki
      soolane+A+Pl+Nom: soolased
      soolane+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: soolaseidki
      soolane+A+Pl+Par: soolaseid
      soolane+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: soolastekski
      soolane+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: soolaseikski
      soolane+A+Pl+Tra: soolasteks
      soolane+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: soolaseiks
      soolane+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: soolastenigi
      soolane+A+Pl+Trm: soolasteni
      soolane+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: soolasetagi
      soolane+A+Sg+Abe: soolaseta
      soolane+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: soolaseltki
      soolane+A+Sg+Abl: soolaselt
      soolane+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: soolaselgi
      soolane+A+Sg+Ade: soolasel
      soolane+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: soolaselegi
      soolane+A+Sg+All: soolasele
      soolane+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: soolasegagi
      soolane+A+Sg+Com: soolasega
      soolane+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: soolasestki
      soolane+A+Sg+Ela: soolasest
      soolane+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: soolasenagi
      soolane+A+Sg+Ess: soolasena
      soolane+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: soolasegi
      soolane+A+Sg+Gen: soolase
      soolane+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: soolasessegi
      soolane+A+Sg+Ill: soolasesse
      soolane+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: soolaseski
      soolane+A+Sg+Ine: soolases
      soolane+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: soolanegi
      soolane+A+Sg+Nom: soolane
      soolane+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: soolastki
      soolane+A+Sg+Par: soolast
      soolane+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: soolasekski
      soolane+A+Sg+Tra: soolaseks
      soolane+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: soolasenigi
      soolane+A+Sg+Trm: soolaseni
      suuline+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: suulistetagi
      suuline+A+Pl+Abe: suulisteta
      suuline+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: suulisteltki
      suuline+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [suuliseiltki, suulisiltki]
      suuline+A+Pl+Abl: suulistelt
      suuline+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: [suuliseilt, suulisilt]
      suuline+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: suulistelgi
      suuline+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [suuliseilgi, suulisilgi]
      suuline+A+Pl+Ade: suulistel
      suuline+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: [suuliseil, suulisil]
      suuline+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: suulistelegi
      suuline+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [suuliseilegi, suulisilegi]
      suuline+A+Pl+All: suulistele
      suuline+A+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: [suuliseile, suulisile]
      suuline+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: suulistegagi
      suuline+A+Pl+Com: suulistega
      suuline+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: suulistestki
      suuline+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [suuliseistki, suulisistki]
      suuline+A+Pl+Ela: suulistest
      suuline+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: [suuliseist, suulisist]
      suuline+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: suulistenagi
      suuline+A+Pl+Ess: suulistena
      suuline+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: suulistegi
      suuline+A+Pl+Gen: suuliste
      suuline+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: suulistessegi
      suuline+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [suuliseissegi, suulisissegi]
      suuline+A+Pl+Ill: suulistesse
      suuline+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: [suuliseisse, suulisisse]
      suuline+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: suulisteski
      suuline+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [suuliseiski, suulisiski]
      suuline+A+Pl+Ine: suulistes
      suuline+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: [suuliseis, suulisis]
      suuline+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: suulisedki
      suuline+A+Pl+Nom: suulised
      suuline+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: suulisigi
      suuline+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: suuliseidki
      suuline+A+Pl+Par: suulisi
      suuline+A+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare: suuliseid
      suuline+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: suulistekski
      suuline+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: [suuliseikski, suulisikski]
      suuline+A+Pl+Tra: suulisteks
      suuline+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: [suuliseiks, suulisiks]
      suuline+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: suulistenigi
      suuline+A+Pl+Trm: suulisteni
      suuline+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: suulisetagi
      suuline+A+Sg+Abe: suuliseta
      suuline+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: suuliseltki
      suuline+A+Sg+Abl: suuliselt
      suuline+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: suuliselgi
      suuline+A+Sg+Ade: suulisel
      suuline+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: suuliselegi
      suuline+A+Sg+All: suulisele
      suuline+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: suulisegagi
      suuline+A+Sg+Com: suulisega
      suuline+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: suulisestki
      suuline+A+Sg+Ela: suulisest
      suuline+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: suulisenagi
      suuline+A+Sg+Ess: suulisena
      suuline+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: suulisegi
      suuline+A+Sg+Gen: suulise
      suuline+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: suulissegi
      suuline+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: suulisessegi
      suuline+A+Sg+Ill: suulisse
      suuline+A+Sg+Ill+Usage/Rare: suulisesse
      suuline+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: suuliseski
      suuline+A+Sg+Ine: suulises
      suuline+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: suulinegi
      suuline+A+Sg+Nom: suuline
      suuline+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: suulistki
      suuline+A+Sg+Par: suulist
      suuline+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: suulisekski
      suuline+A+Sg+Tra: suuliseks
      suuline+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: suulisenigi
      suuline+A+Sg+Trm: suuliseni
      valmis+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: valmitetagi
      valmis+A+Pl+Abe: valmiteta
      valmis+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: valmeiltki
      valmis+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: valmiteltki
      valmis+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: valmeilt
      valmis+A+Pl+Abl: valmitelt
      valmis+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: valmeilgi
      valmis+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: valmitelgi
      valmis+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: valmeil
      valmis+A+Pl+Ade: valmitel
      valmis+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: valmeilegi
      valmis+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: valmitelegi
      valmis+A+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: valmeile
      valmis+A+Pl+All: valmitele
      valmis+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: valmitegagi
      valmis+A+Pl+Com: valmitega
      valmis+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: valmeistki
      valmis+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: valmitestki
      valmis+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: valmeist
      valmis+A+Pl+Ela: valmitest
      valmis+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: valmitenagi
      valmis+A+Pl+Ess: valmitena
      valmis+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: valmitegi
      valmis+A+Pl+Gen: valmite
      valmis+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: valmeissegi
      valmis+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: valmitessegi
      valmis+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: valmeisse
      valmis+A+Pl+Ill: valmitesse
      valmis+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: valmeiski
      valmis+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: valmiteski
      valmis+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: valmeis
      valmis+A+Pl+Ine: valmites
      valmis+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: valmidki
      valmis+A+Pl+Nom: valmid
      valmis+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: valmeidki
      valmis+A+Pl+Par: valmeid
      valmis+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: valmeikski
      valmis+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: valmitekski
      valmis+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: valmeiks
      valmis+A+Pl+Tra: valmiteks
      valmis+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: valmitenigi
      valmis+A+Pl+Trm: valmiteni
      valmis+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: valmitagi
      valmis+A+Sg+Abe: valmita
      valmis+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: valmiltki
      valmis+A+Sg+Abl: valmilt
      valmis+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: valmilgi
      valmis+A+Sg+Ade: valmil
      valmis+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: valmilegi
      valmis+A+Sg+All: valmile
      valmis+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: valmigagi
      valmis+A+Sg+Com: valmiga
      valmis+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: valmistki
      valmis+A+Sg+Ela: valmist
      valmis+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: valminagi
      valmis+A+Sg+Ess: valmina
      valmis+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: valmigi
      valmis+A+Sg+Gen: valmi
      valmis+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: valmissegi
      valmis+A+Sg+Ill: valmisse
      valmis+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: valmiski
      valmis+A+Sg+Ine: valmis
      valmis+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: valmiski
      valmis+A+Sg+Nom: valmis
      valmis+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: valmitki
      valmis+A+Sg+Par: valmit
      valmis+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: valmikski
      valmis+A+Sg+Tra: valmiks
      valmis+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: valminigi
      valmis+A+Sg+Trm: valmini
      veider+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: veidratetagi
      veider+A+Pl+Abe: veidrateta
      veider+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: veidrailtki
      veider+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: veidrateltki
      veider+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: veidrailt
      veider+A+Pl+Abl: veidratelt
      veider+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: veidrailgi
      veider+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: veidratelgi
      veider+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: veidrail
      veider+A+Pl+Ade: veidratel
      veider+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: veidrailegi
      veider+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: veidratelegi
      veider+A+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: veidraile
      veider+A+Pl+All: veidratele
      veider+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: veidrategagi
      veider+A+Pl+Com: veidratega
      veider+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: veidraistki
      veider+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: veidratestki
      veider+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: veidraist
      veider+A+Pl+Ela: veidratest
      veider+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: veidratenagi
      veider+A+Pl+Ess: veidratena
      veider+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: veidrategi
      veider+A+Pl+Gen: veidrate
      veider+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: veidraissegi
      veider+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: veidratessegi
      veider+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: veidraisse
      veider+A+Pl+Ill: veidratesse
      veider+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: veidraiski
      veider+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: veidrateski
      veider+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: veidrais
      veider+A+Pl+Ine: veidrates
      veider+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: veidradki
      veider+A+Pl+Nom: veidrad
      veider+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: veidraidki
      veider+A+Pl+Par: veidraid
      veider+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: veidraikski
